District of Columbia statutes.
47-396.01

Expenditure of revenues for Convention Center activities.

The fourth sentence of § 1-204.46 shall not apply with respect to the expenditure or obligation of any revenues of the Washington Convention Center Authority for any purpose authorized under the Washington Convention Center Authority Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-188).

History

Sept. 6, 1995, 109 Stat. 267, Pub. L. 104-28, § 101
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 12, 1998, 112 Stat. 1515, Pub. L. 105-227, § 1(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-396.1.

References in Text

The “Washington Convention Center Authority Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-188),” referenced in this section, is codified principally as Chapter 12 of Title 10.

Editor's Notes

Waiver of Congressional review: For provisions waiving Congressional review of the Arena Tax Payment and Use Amendment Act of 1995, see § 301 of Pub. Law 104-28, 109 Stat. 270.